Washington statutes.
RCW 42.24.100

Municipal corporations and political subdivisions—Certificates need not be sworn—Penalty for false claim.

The certificates required by RCW 42.24.080 through 42.24.110 need not be sworn, but any person certifying a claim or making a claim knowing the same to be false or untrue shall be guilty of perjury in the second degree.

[ 1965 c 116 s 3.]